Maryland, session 2026, SB0365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
19–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) “Secretary”, unless the context requires otherwise, means the Secretary of
State Police.
19–401.
(a) Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, a licensed security
guard agency may provide an individual for hire as a security guard only if the individual
is certified by the Secretary as a security guard.
19–404.1.
– 1 –

Ch. 238 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) [By regulation, the Secretary shall stagger the terms of the certifications.
(b)] Unless a certification is renewed for a 3–year term as provided in this section,
the certification expires on the [date the Secretary sets] LAST DAY OF THE
CERTIFICATION HOLDER’S BIRTH MONTH.
(B) (1) AT LEAST 90 DAYS, 60 DAYS, AND 30 DAYS BEFORE A
CERTIFICATION EXPIRES, THE SECRETARY SHALL SEND A RENEWAL NOTICE TO A
CERTIFICATION HOLDER THAT STATES:
(I) THE DATE ON WHICH THE CERTIFICATION EXPIRES; AND
(II) THAT THE RENEWAL APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION
MUST BE RECEIVED AND ACCEPTED BY THE SECRETARY BEFORE THE DATE THE
CERTIFICATION EXPIRES.
(2) THE SECRETARY SHALL SEND A RENEWAL NOTICE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION BY ELECTRONIC MEANS TO THE LAST KNOWN
E–MAIL ADDRESS OF THE CERTIFICATION HOLDER.
(c) [At least 90 days before] BEFORE a certification expires, the applicant shall
submit to the Secretary in the manner and format designated by the Secretary:
(1) a renewal application; AND
(2) the amount of the renewal fee in a method approved by the Secretary[;
and
(3) the amount of any late fee, as determined by the Secretary].
(d) An individual periodically may renew the certification for an additional
3–year term, if the individual:
(1) otherwise is entitled to be certified;
(2) pays to the Secretary in a method approved by the Secretary:
(i) a renewal fee of $10; AND
(ii) payment for the cost of a fingerprint card record check by the
Federal Bureau of Investigation; [and
(iii) any late fee required under this subtitle;]
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 238
(3) (i) satisfactorily completes 8 hours of continuing security training
that is approved by the Maryland Police Training and Standards Commission under §
19–412 of this subtitle; and
(ii) submits to the Secretary supporting documentation that
demonstrates completion of the training; and
(4) submits to the Secretary a renewal application in the manner and
format designated by the Secretary.
(e) [(1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, if a complete application for
renewal of certification as required under this subtitle is not received by the Secretary on
or before the first business day of the next calendar month immediately following the
renewal date, the Secretary shall assess a late fee of $5 per day until the application is
received by the Secretary.
(2) (i) The Secretary may not charge a late fee under paragraph (1) of
this subsection if the applicant did not make timely renewal because of incapacity,
hospitalization, being called to active military duty, or other hardship.
(3)] The Secretary may not certify any applicant under this subtitle if the
applicant has outstanding [late fee] obligations UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(f) (1) The Secretary shall renew the certification of each individual who
meets the requirements of this section.
(2) Within 5 days after the Secretary refuses to renew the certification of
an individual as a security guard, the Secretary shall send written notice of the refusal to
the individual who submitted the renewal application.
[(g) At least 90 days before a certification expires, the licensed security guard
agency or security guard employer shall submit a declaration to the Secretary under the
penalties of perjury stating whether it knows that a certified security guard who provides
security guard services on the security guard agency’s behalf or for the security guard
employer no longer satisfies all of the criteria for certification under § 19–402 of this
subtitle.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 3 –